Maryland, session 2026, SB0884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–1501.
(b) There is a Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Businesses Account under the
authority of the Department.
(c) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under [§ 9–1A–27] §§
9–1A–27 AND 9–1F–05 of the State Government Article.
Article – Education
5–206.
(b) There is the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue distributed to the Fund under Title 9, Subtitles 1D [and 1E]
THROUGH 1F of the State Government Article and §§ 2–4A–02, 2–605.1, and 2–1303 of
the Tax – General Article;

SENATE BILL 884 3
(2) Money appropriated in the State budget for the Fund; and
(3) Interest earned by the Academic Excellence Fund established under §
6–1105 of this article; and
(4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
Article – State Government
9–1A–28.
(a) There is a Purse Dedication Account under the authority of the State Racing
Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of this
subtitle AND § 9–1F–05 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1A–29.
(a) There is a Racetrack Facility Renewal Account under the authority of the
State Racing Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of this
subtitle AND § 9–1F–05 OF THIS TITLE for the first 16 years of operations at each video
lottery facility.
SUBTITLE 1F. INTERNET POKER AND SKILL–BASED GAMING.
9–1F–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
COMMISSION.
(C) “ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED AREA” MEANS A GEOGRAPHIC AREA
IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION THAT MEETS THREE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING
CRITERIA:
(1) HAS A MEDIAN INCOME RATE THAT IS 80% OR LESS OF THE
AVERAGE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED;

SENATE BILL 884
(2) HAS AN UNEMPLOYMENT RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE
UNEMPLOYMENT RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS
LOCATED;
(3) HAS AN UNINSURED RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE HEALTH
UNINSURED RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS
LOCATED;
(4) HAS A SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
PARTICIPATION RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM PARTICIPATION RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED; AND
(5) HAS A POVERTY RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE POVERTY
RATE IN THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED.
(D) “INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING” MEANS SKILL–BASED GAMING
THROUGH AN ONLINE GAMING SYSTEM:
(1) ON A COMPUTER, A MOBILE DEVICE, OR ANY OTHER INTERACTIVE
DEVICE; AND
(2) THAT IS CONDUCTED BY AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE OR A PERSON WHO OPERATES INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ON
BEHALF OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE.
(E) “INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED
BY THE COMMISSION TO CONDUCT INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING IN THE STATE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE” MEANS THE HOLDER OF
AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING OPERATOR” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT
HOLDS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO CONDUCT
AND OPERATE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE.
(H) “MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–1E–01 OF THIS TITLE.
(I) “PROCEEDS” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF MONEY:

SENATE BILL 884 5
(1) RETAINED BY AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE OR
OPERATOR FOR OPERATING AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAME; AND
(2) BET ON INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING, LESS:
(I) THE AMOUNT RETURNED TO SUCCESSFUL PLAYERS; AND
(II) THE CASH EQUIVALENTS OF ANY MERCHANDISE OR THING
OF VALUE AWARDED AS A PRIZE TO SUCCESSFUL PLAYERS.
(J) (1) “SKILL–BASED GAME” MEANS A GAME WHERE THE PLAYER’S
STRATEGY, ABILITIES, AND DECISIONS SUBSTANTIALLY INFLUENCE THE OUTCOME
OF THE GAME.
(2) “SKILL–BASED GAME” INCLUDES:
(I) POKER; AND
(II) ANY GAME, SUCH AS BACKGAMMON OR CHESS, THAT THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES IS A SKILL–BASED GAME.
(K) “SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–1E–01 OF THIS TITLE.
(L) “VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–1A–01
OF THIS TITLE.
(M) “VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–1A–01
OF THIS TITLE.
9–1F–02.
(A) (1) THIS SUBTITLE AUTHORIZES AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE TO CONDUCT AND OPERATE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING IN THE
STATE AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY ENTER INTO
AN AGREEMENT WITH UP TO ONE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING OPERATOR.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION
SHALL REGULATE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING AND THE CONDUCT OF
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT THE COMMISSION
REGULATES THE OPERATION OF VIDEO LOTTERY TERMINALS AND TABLE GAMES

SENATE BILL 884
UNDER SUBTITLE 1A OF THIS TITLE AND MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING UNDER
SUBTITLE 1E OF THIS TITLE.
(C) UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER §§ 9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18,
9–1A–19, 9–1A–20, AND 9–1A–25 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO THE AUTHORITY, DUTIES,
AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE COMMISSION, AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE, AND AN EMPLOYEE OR A CONTRACTOR OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSEE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL BE LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) A PERSON THAT CONDUCTS INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING;
(II) A PERSON THAT CONDUCTS INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE, INCLUDING
AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING OPERATOR;
(III) A LIVE STUDIO DEALER, AS DEFINED UNDER § 9–1F–10 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) A PERSON NOT LICENSED UNDER ITEM (I), (II), OR (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH THAT MANAGES, OPERATES, SUPPLIES, PROVIDES SECURITY FOR,
OR PROVIDES SERVICE, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIRS FOR AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE; AND
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL DIRECTLY EMPLOYED IN THE OPERATION
OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING BY AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE IF THE INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT OTHERWISE HOLD A VALID LICENSE UNDER
SUBTITLE 1A OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY BY REGULATION REQUIRE A PERSON THAT
CONTRACTS WITH A LICENSEE AND THE PERSON’S EMPLOYEES TO OBTAIN A
LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE
LICENSING REQUIREMENTS ARE NECESSARY IN ORDER TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC
INTEREST AND ACCOMPLISH THE POLICIES ESTABLISHED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSION MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO A PERSON
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
APPLICANT OR ANY OF THE APPLICANT’S AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER

SENATE BILL 884 7
COMMON CONTROL, IS KNOWINGLY ACCEPTING REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM:
(I) A JURISDICTION ON THE BLACK LIST OF MONEY
LAUNDERING COUNTRIES ESTABLISHED BY THE FINANCIAL ACTION TASK FORCE;
(II) A JURISDICTION DESIGNATED AS A STATE SPONSOR OF
TERRORISM BY THE UNITED STATES; OR
(III) A JURISDICTION IN WHICH ONLINE CASINO GAMING IS
PROHIBITED AND THE REVENUE IS DERIVED FROM ONLINE CASINO GAMING IN THAT
JURISDICTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY REVOKE THE LICENSE OF A PERSON
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT:
(I) THE LICENSE HOLDER OR ANY OF THE LICENSE HOLDER’S
AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER COMMON CONTROL, IS KNOWINGLY
ACCEPTING REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM A
JURISDICTION DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) AFTER NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, IT
WOULD FURTHER THE PUBLIC INTEREST TO DISCONTINUE THE OPERATIONS OF THE
LICENSE HOLDER IN THE STATE.
(3) (I) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
2. “ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET” MEANS A
JURISDICTION IN WHICH INTERACTIVE GAMING IS PROHIBITED BY THE LAWS OF
THAT JURISDICTION.
3. “INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT” MEANS HARDWARE,
SOFTWARE, APPLICATIONS, AND SERVERS USED TO OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR OFFER
INTERACTIVE GAMBLING GAMES.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE A PERSON DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON APPLICATION FOR
A LICENSE AND ANNUALLY FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE, TO SUBMIT A
DISCLOSURE STATING THE JURISDICTIONS IN WHICH THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE
HOLDER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER, DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY

SENATE BILL 884
ACCEPTED REVENUE FROM THE SUPPLY OF INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT IN AN
ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET.
(III) A MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION OR OMISSION ON THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY, IN
THE DISCRETION OF THE COMMISSION, RESULT IN THE DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION
FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR, IN THE CASE OF A LICENSE HOLDER,
DISCIPLINARY ACTION, INCLUDING A SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE LICENSE
AND PENALTIES FOR OFFICERS OR BOARD MEMBERS OF THE LICENSE HOLDER.
(F) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE TYPE OF SKILL–BASED GAMES THAT AN
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY OFFER.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL ALLOW AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE TO OFFER POKER GAMES.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF ITS INTENT
TO ALLOW AN ADDITIONAL TYPE OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAME TO THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY ALLOW THE ADDITIONAL TYPE OF
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAME:
1. ON RECEIPT OF WRITTEN COMMENT FROM THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE; OR
2. 45 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE WAS RECEIVED BY THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH:
(1) THE FORM AND CONTENT OF AN APPLICATION FOR ANY LICENSE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) STANDARDS, PROCEDURES, AND RULES THAT GOVERN THE
CONDUCT AND OPERATION OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING; AND
(3) ANY OTHER REGULATION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1F–03.

SENATE BILL 884 9
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THIS SUBTITLE BE
IMPLEMENTED IN A MANNER THAT, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY STATE AND
FEDERAL LAW, MAXIMIZES THE ABILITY OF MINORITIES, WOMEN, AND
MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING INDUSTRY, INCLUDING THROUGH THE OWNERSHIP OF
ENTITIES LICENSED TO CONDUCT INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “MAJORITY MINORITY–OWNED APPLICANT
OR JOINT VENTURE APPLICANT” MEANS AN APPLICANT FOR AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IN WHICH:
(I) ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS OR ENTITIES CERTIFIED AS
MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OWN AT LEAST
51% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE APPLICANT; OR
(II) IN THE CASE OF A JOINT VENTURE, ONE OR MORE ENTITIES
DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OWN
AT LEAST 51% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE JOINT VENTURE.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSE TO:
1. A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR;
2. A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE OR A
MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE;
3. AN APPLICANT THAT EMPLOYS AT LEAST 100
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE ON A FULL–TIME OR
FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT BASIS; AND
4. A MAJORITY MINORITY–OWNED APPLICANT OR JOINT
VENTURE.
(II) AN APPLICANT THAT HOLDS MORE THAN ONE LICENSE
UNDER SUBTITLE 1A OR SUBTITLE 1E OF THIS TITLE MAY APPLY FOR ONLY A
SINGLE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE.
(III) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FACTORS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION BY REGULATION, THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW APPLICATIONS
FOR INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSES UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH BASED
ON:

SENATE BILL 884
1. THE APPLICANT’S FINANCIAL STABILITY,
RESOURCES, INTEGRITY, AND BUSINESS ABILITY AND ACUMEN;
2. THE APPLICANT’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
PLANS FOR INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING INDUSTRY EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE;
3. THE APPLICANT’S PLANS FOR EMPLOYING
INDIVIDUALS IN THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING INDUSTRY WHO RESIDE IN
ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED AREAS; AND
4. THE APPLICANT’S RESPONSIBLE GAMING PROGRAMS
AND AN EFFECTIVE GOVERNANCE AND COMPLIANCE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT WITH A CONSULTANT TO
ASSIST THE COMMISSION WITH THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSE APPLICATION AND THE REVIEW OF APPLICANTS.
(II) AS PART OF THE REVIEW OF AN APPLICATION FOR AN
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE TO THE APPLICANT SERVES THE PUBLIC
INTEREST.
(4) (I) THE INITIAL LICENSE FEE FOR AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSE IS:
1. $1,000,000; OR
2. $500,000 FOR A MAJORITY MINORITY–OWNED
APPLICANT OR JOINT VENTURE APPLICANT.
(II) THE TERM OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE
IS 5 YEARS.
(5) (I) ON APPLICATION BY AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE AND PAYMENT OF A LICENSE RENEWAL FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL RENEW FOR 5 YEARS AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE IF THE LICENSEE COMPLIES WITH ALL STATUTORY
AND REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS.
(II) THE LICENSE RENEWAL FEE IS EQUAL TO 1% OF THE
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE’S AVERAGE ANNUAL PROCEEDS
RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER § 9–1F–05(B)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE
PRECEDING 3–YEAR PERIOD.

SENATE BILL 884 11
(C) ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL PREPARED BY THE
COMMISSION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS FROM
THE LICENSE FEES COLLECTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AN AMOUNT TO THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
AGENCY NECESSARY TO REIMBURSE THE AGENCY FOR EXPENSES RELATED TO THE
ISSUANCE AND RENEWAL OF LICENSES UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) 1% TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) THE REMAINDER TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) FOR ALL LICENSES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, IF AN APPLICANT
HOLDS A VALID GAMING OR GAMING OPERATION LICENSE IN THIS STATE OR AT
LEAST THREE OTHER STATES AND THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE
LICENSING STANDARDS OF THE ISSUING AGENCY ARE COMPREHENSIVE AND
THOROUGH AND PROVIDE SIMILAR AND ADEQUATE SAFEGUARDS TO THOSE
PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY:
(1) WAIVE SOME OR ALL OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(2) ISSUE A LICENSE TO THAT APPLICANT.
(E) (1) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE, THE LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION
A DIVERSITY PLAN THAT DESCRIBES THE STEPS THAT THE LICENSEE WILL TAKE TO
PROMOTE MEANINGFUL DIVERSITY AMONG ITS OWNERS, INVESTORS, MANAGERS,
EMPLOYEES, AND CONTRACTORS AND TO PROMOTE EQUALITY OF OPPORTUNITY.
(2) EACH INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE SHALL MAKE
GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO MEET THE DIVERSITY OBJECTIVES OUTLINED IN THE
DIVERSITY PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ANY NECESSARY METRICS TO MEASURE PROGRESS IN
MEETING THOSE OBJECTIVES.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY MAKE THE DIVERSITY PLANS AND
METRICS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE
PUBLIC.

SENATE BILL 884
(F) (1) AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY NOT
TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL OF THE LICENSE FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 3
YEARS FOLLOWING ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE.
(2) THE LIMITATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO
TRANSFERS AS A RESULT OF THE DISABILITY, INCAPACITY, OR DEATH OF THE
OWNER OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE, BANKRUPTCY OR
RECEIVERSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH A LENDING AGREEMENT OF AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE, OR COURT ORDER.
9–1F–04.
(A) AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE:
(1) SHALL:
(I) COMPLY WITH ALL STATE AND FEDERAL DATA PRIVACY AND
SECURITY LAWS;
(II) MAINTAIN ALL INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING DATA
SECURELY FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS;
(III) AUTHORIZE ONLY INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE AT LEAST 21
YEARS OLD TO ENGAGE IN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING; AND
(IV) VERIFY AN INDIVIDUAL’S AGE AND IDENTITY AT THE TIME
THE INDIVIDUAL ESTABLISHES AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACCOUNT AND
PERIODICALLY REVERIFY THE INDIVIDUAL’S IDENTITY; AND
(2) MAY NOT:
(I) SHARE ANY PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
WITH ANY THIRD PARTIES WITHOUT PERMISSION, EXCEPT AS NEEDED TO OPERATE
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING, ADMINISTER THE LICENSEE’S OBLIGATIONS
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, AND SUPPORT PROBLEM GAMBLING INITIATIVES;
(II) TARGET ADVERTISING TO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
PROHIBITED FROM PARTICIPATING IN GAMBLING ACTIVITIES UNDER THIS TITLE
AND OTHER AT–RISK INDIVIDUALS; OR
(III) ENGAGE IN ANY FALSE OR DECEPTIVE ADVERTISING.
(B) (1) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE

SENATE BILL 884 13
PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE STATE’S MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE,
SHALL ESTABLISH A CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND APPROPRIATE
MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND PROCEDURES FOR
THE PROCUREMENT OF GOODS AND SERVICES RELATED TO INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING.
(II) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND
PROCEDURES SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
BASED ON THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT
SUBTITLE.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE, AN
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE, OR AN ENTITY THAT OPERATES A LIVE
DEALER STUDIO ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE
SHALL PRODUCE INFORMATION, DOCUMENTATION, AND ASSURANCES TO
ESTABLISH BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT:
(1) UNLESS THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO
OPERATOR ALREADY HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, THE
APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO OPERATOR HAS ENTERED INTO A
LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT WITH EACH LABOR ORGANIZATION THAT IS ACTIVELY
ENGAGED IN REPRESENTING OR ATTEMPTING TO REPRESENT INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING INDUSTRY WORKERS, INCLUDING DEALERS CONDUCTING
LIVE DEALER GAMES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–10 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN THE
STATE;
(2) THE LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT IS VALID AND ENFORCEABLE
UNDER 29 U.S.C. § 158;
(3) THE LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT PROTECTS THE STATE’S
REVENUES BY PROHIBITING THE LABOR ORGANIZATION AND ITS MEMBERS FROM
ENGAGING IN PICKETING, WORK STOPPAGES, BOYCOTTS, AND ANY OTHER
ECONOMIC INTERFERENCE WITH THE OPERATION OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED

SENATE BILL 884
GAMING WITHIN THE FIRST 5 YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSE; AND
(4) THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO OPERATOR
INTENDS TO MAINTAIN A NEUTRAL POSITION ON THE UNIONIZATION OF ANY
EMPLOYEES OF THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR OPERATOR, INCLUDING BY
REFRAINING FROM MAKING ANY STATEMENT OR IMPLICATION THAT THE
APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR OPERATOR:
(I) OPPOSES THE SELECTION OR DESELECTION OF A
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGENT; OR
(II) SUPPORTS OR OPPOSES THE SELECTION OF A PARTICULAR
LABOR ORGANIZATION AS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGENT.
9–1F–05.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCOUNT TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR
ALL OF THE REVENUE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING, LESS
THE AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, SHALL BE UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE COMPTROLLER AND
DISTRIBUTED AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ALL PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING SHALL BE
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSFERRED DAILY INTO THE STATE LOTTERY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) A LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN 70% OF THE PROCEEDS FROM
ALL INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING.
(2) ALL PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING IN THE
STATE LOTTERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED ON A MONTHLY BASIS, ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL
PREPARED BY THE COMMISSION, IN THE FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) 5.5% TO JURISDICTIONS WITH VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITIES
BASED ON EACH JURISDICTION’S PERCENTAGE OF OVERALL GROSS REVENUES
FROM VIDEO LOTTERY TERMINALS FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED UNDER §
9–1A–31(B) OF THIS TITLE;

SENATE BILL 884 15
(II) 6% TO THE PURSE DEDICATION ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–28 OF THIS TITLE;
(III) 1% TO THE RACETRACK FACILITY RENEWAL ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–29 OF THIS TITLE;
(IV) 1.5% TO THE SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN–OWNED
BUSINESSES ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1501 OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
(V) 1% OF ALL PROCEEDS TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(VI) THE REMAINDER TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
9–1F–06.
(A) IN ORDER TO ASSIST INDIVIDUALS WHO MAY HAVE A GAMBLING
PROBLEM, AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE SHALL:
(1) CAUSE THE WORDS “IF YOU OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW HAS A
GAMBLING PROBLEM AND WANTS HELP, CALL 1–800–GAMBLER” OR SOME
COMPARABLE LANGUAGE APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION TO BE DISPLAYED
PROMINENTLY AT LOG–ON AND LOG–OFF TIMES TO ANY INDIVIDUAL VISITING OR
LOGGED ONTO AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING PLATFORM;
(2) REQUIRE AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACCOUNT HOLDER
TO ESTABLISH A LIMIT ON THE AMOUNT OF MONEY DEPOSITED WITHIN A SPECIFIED
PERIOD OF TIME AND THE LENGTH OF TIME THE ACCOUNT HOLDER WILL BE UNABLE
TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING AND MAKE ADDITIONAL
DEPOSITS IF THE ACCOUNT HOLDER REACHES THE ESTABLISHED DEPOSIT LIMIT;
(3) PROVIDE A MECHANISM BY WHICH AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY ESTABLISH A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACTIVITY THROUGH THE ACCOUNT FOR ANY
NUMBER OF HOURS OR DAYS;
(4) PROHIBIT THE USE OF CREDIT CARDS FOR ANY INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING–RELATED TRANSACTIONS; AND
(5) (I) CAUSE THE DISPLAY OF A PROBLEM GAMBLING
DISCLOSURE CONCERNING THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH GAMBLING AND THE
SUPPORT AVAILABLE TO PROBLEM GAMBLERS AT ACCOUNT LOG–IN;

SENATE BILL 884
(II) REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO CERTIFY THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM
BEFORE ESTABLISHING AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACCOUNT; AND
(III) REQUIRE EACH USER TO CERTIFY ON A MONTHLY BASIS
THAT THE USER HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
ITEM.
(B) IF A SUSPENSION OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACTIVITY UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION IS IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER FOR AT
LEAST 72 HOURS, THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY NOT SEND
GAMING–RELATED E–MAIL TO THE ACCOUNT HOLDER UNTIL THE SUSPENSION
EXPIRES.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE A MECHANISM BY
WHICH AN ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY PERIODICALLY CHANGE THE CONTROLS ON
GAMING ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE ACCOUNT IS SUSPENDED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY NOT
CHANGE GAMING CONTROLS UNTIL THE SUSPENSION EXPIRES.
(3) IF AN ACCOUNT HOLDER SEEKS TO INCREASE THE LIMIT ON THE
AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY DEPOSIT WITHIN A PERIOD
OF TIME SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY NOT REFLECT THE INCREASED LIMIT FOR AT
LEAST 24 HOURS.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY AN ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY CONTINUE TO
HAVE ACCESS TO THE ACCOUNT AND IS AUTHORIZED TO WITHDRAW FUNDS FROM
THE ACCOUNT ON PROPER APPLICATION TO THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE
INTENDED TO REDUCE OR MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF PROBLEM GAMBLING.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE ESTABLISHMENT OF A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WITH GAMBLING PROBLEMS WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE

SENATE BILL 884 17
EXCLUDED FROM ANY INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) PROVIDE A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
SOBER AND INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
(3) UNLESS AN INDIVIDUAL REQUESTING PLACEMENT ON THE
VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES THE PROVISION OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE MARYLAND CENTER OF
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER FOR THE PURPOSE OF
PROVIDING THE INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND CONFIDENTIAL
RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
(4) AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE:
(I) MAY NOT PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY
EXCLUSION LIST TO ESTABLISH AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ACCOUNT OR
ENGAGE IN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING; AND
(II) MAY PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY
EXCLUSION LIST WHO PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING ACCOUNT TO ACCESS THE ACCOUNT ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF VIEWING
AND DOWNLOADING THE INDIVIDUAL’S TRANSACTION HISTORY.
(5) THE COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE SANCTIONS ON A LICENSEE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LICENSEE KNOWINGLY FAILS TO
EXCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST FROM ENGAGING IN
INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING.
(F) AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR, EACH INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING
LICENSEE SHALL REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF PLAYERS THAT THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSEE HAS IDENTIFIED AS ENGAGING IN ERRATIC OR INCREASED
GAMBLING BEHAVIOR; AND
(2) THE NUMBER AND LENGTH OF ANY BANS OR SUSPENSIONS IN
RESPONSE TO THE BEHAVIOR DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
9–1F–07.

SENATE BILL 884
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000,000
AGAINST ANY PERSON WHO:
(1) KNOWINGLY TAMPERS WITH SOFTWARE, COMPUTERS, OR OTHER
EQUIPMENT USED TO CONDUCT INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING TO ALTER THE
ODDS OR THE PAYOUT OF A GAME OR DISABLE THE GAME FROM OPERATING
ACCORDING TO THE RULES OF THE GAME AS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION; OR
(2) KNOWINGLY OFFERS OR ALLOWS TO BE OFFERED ANY INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAME THAT HAS BEEN TAMPERED WITH IN A WAY THAT AFFECTS THE
ODDS OR THE PAYOUT OF A GAME OR HAS BEEN DISABLED FROM OPERATING
ACCORDING TO THE RULES OF THE GAME AS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY SUSPEND, FOR NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS, THE
LICENSE OF AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE OR ANY OTHER PERSON
REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WHO IS IN VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
9–1F–08.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE MARYLAND CENTER OF
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE IMPACT OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ON PROBLEM
GAMBLERS AND GAMBLING ADDICTION IN THE STATE; AND
(2) THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
CONTROLS IN PLACE TO ENSURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF MEASURES TO PROTECT
VULNERABLE AND PROBLEM GAMBLERS.
9–1F–09.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE ALL TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS
RELATED TO INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING CONDUCTED IN THE STATE AND
ACQUIRED BY AN OPERATOR OF THE LICENSEE ON A MONTHLY, QUARTERLY, OR
ANNUAL BASIS TO MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY AND BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY.
(B) THE TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL EXCLUDE ANY PERSONALLY
IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.

SENATE BILL 884 19
9–1F–10.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE SKILL–BASED GAME” MEANS ANY
SKILL–BASED GAME APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION IN WHICH INDIVIDUALS
WAGER MONEY OR SOMETHING OF MONETARY VALUE THAT IS ACCESSED BY A
COMPUTER OR MOBILE DEVICE THAT IS CONNECTED TO THE INTERNET.
(3) “LIVE DEALER SKILL–BASED GAME” MEANS AN AUTHORIZED
INTERACTIVE SKILL–BASED GAME CONDUCTED BY LIVE STUDIO DEALERS OR OTHER
PHYSICAL GAMING EQUIPMENT IN A LIVE GAME ENVIRONMENT IN WHICH THE
AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS HAVE THE ABILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN GAMEPLAY AND
COMMUNICATE GAME DECISIONS THROUGH AN AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE
SKILL–BASED GAMING PLATFORM.
(4) “LIVE GAMING STUDIO” MEANS A PHYSICAL LOCATION IN THE
STATE THAT UTILIZES LIVE VIDEO STREAMING TECHNOLOGY TO PROVIDE
AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE SKILL–BASED GAMES TO A PLAYER’S INTERACTIVE
GAMING DEVICE OR MULTI–USE COMPUTING DEVICE.
(5) “LIVE STUDIO DEALER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) LEADS A SKILL–BASED GAME WHILE ASSISTING
AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS WITH GAME–RELATED NEEDS;
(II) DISTRIBUTES VIRTUAL CARDS, DICE, OR OTHER
EQUIPMENT TO AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS; AND
(III) MONITORS GAME PACE AND PLAY.
(B) SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION, AN INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE MAY OFFER AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE
SKILL–BASED GAMES, INCLUDING GAMING TOURNAMENTS IN WHICH PLAYERS
COMPETE AGAINST ONE ANOTHER IN ONE OR MORE OF THE GAMES AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR BY THE COMMISSION OR IN APPROVED VARIATIONS OR
COMPOSITES OF THOSE GAMES.
(C) AN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING OPERATOR MAY USE LIVE STUDIO
DEALERS TO ADMINISTER AN AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE SKILL–BASED GAME.
(D) A LIVE GAMING STUDIO USED TO CONDUCT A LIVE DEALER GAME
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 884
(1) SHALL BE LOCATED WITHIN THE STATE; AND
(2) IF THE INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING LICENSEE IS A VIDEO
LOTTERY OPERATOR, SHALL BE LOCATED WITHIN THE COUNTY WITHIN WHICH THE
VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY IS LOCATED.
9–1F–11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GOVERNMENT” MEANS ANY GOVERNMENTAL UNIT,
OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT, OF A NATIONAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
BODY EXERCISING GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTIONS.
(B) ON RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSION, THE GOVERNOR, ON
BEHALF OF THE STATE, IS AUTHORIZED TO:
(1) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTS,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, THAT ALLOWS AND PROVIDES FOR
PARTICIPATION IN MULTIJURISDICTIONAL INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING BY
INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN JURISDICTIONS OVER WHICH THE
GOVERNMENTS THAT ARE A PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT EXERCISE LEGAL
AUTHORITY; AND
(2) TAKE ALL NECESSARY ACTIONS TO ENSURE THAT ANY
AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO UNDER THIS SECTION BECOMES EFFECTIVE.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT PROVIDE FOR:
(1) THE FORM, LENGTH, AND TERMS OF AN AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) MATTERS RELATING TO THE TAXATION OF INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING REVENUE BY THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(3) THE SHARING AND DISTRIBUTION OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING REVENUE AMONG THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(4) RESOLUTION OF PLAYER DISPUTES;
(5) THE INFORMATION THAT A GOVERNMENT PROPOSING TO ENTER
INTO THE AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE MUST PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION;

SENATE BILL 884 21
(6) THE MANNER AND PROCEDURE FOR HEARINGS CONDUCTED BY
THE COMMISSION WITH RESPECT TO ANY AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(7) THE INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE GOVERNOR THAT SUPPORTS THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMISSION
MADE UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(8) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS THE AGREEMENT INCLUDES TERMS:
(1) FOR ANY POTENTIAL ARRANGEMENT FOR THE SHARING OF
REVENUES BY THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(2) PERMITTING THE EFFECTIVE REGULATION OF INTERNET
SKILL–BASED GAMING BY THE STATE, INCLUDING PROVISIONS RELATING TO
LICENSING, TECHNICAL STANDARDS TO BE FOLLOWED, RESOLUTION OF DISPUTES
BY PATRONS, REQUIREMENTS FOR BANKROLLS, ENFORCEMENT, ACCOUNTING, AND
MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS;
(3) BY WHICH EACH PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT AGREES TO PROHIBIT
OPERATORS OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING, SERVICE PROVIDERS, AND
MANUFACTURERS OR DISTRIBUTORS OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING SYSTEMS
FROM ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIVITY PERMITTED UNDER THE AGREEMENT UNLESS
THOSE PERSONS ARE LICENSED OR FOUND SUITABLE:
(I) UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) BY ANY OTHER PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT UNDER
REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE MATERIALLY CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) PROHIBITING VARIATION OR DEROGATION FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE AGREEMENT FOR ANY PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT ABSENT
THE CONSENT OF ALL PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(5) PROHIBITING ANY SUBORDINATE OR SIDE AGREEMENTS, EXCEPT
WITH RESPECT TO SHARING OF REVENUES, AMONG ANY SUBSET OF THE
GOVERNMENTS THAT ARE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT; AND
(6) IF THE AGREEMENT ALLOWS INDIVIDUALS PHYSICALLY LOCATED
IN THE STATE TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING CONDUCTED BY

SENATE BILL 884
ANOTHER PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT OR AN OPERATOR OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING LICENSED BY THE OTHER PARTY, REQUIRING THAT PARTY TO ESTABLISH
AND MAINTAIN REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS GOVERNING INTERNET SKILL–BASED
GAMING THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE IN
ALL MATERIAL RESPECTS.
9–1F–12.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE OPERATION OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING IN THE
STATE; AND
(2) THE IMPACT OF INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING ON VIDEO
LOTTERY FACILITIES, OTHER GAMING VENUES, AND ANCILLARY BUSINESSES THAT
SURROUND THOSE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITIES AND GAMING VENUES.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) STUDY THE IMPACTS OF ONLINE FORMS OF UNAUTHORIZED
GAMING CONTENT THAT ARE SIMILAR TO INTERNET SKILL–BASED GAMING, SUCH AS
PLATFORMS THAT USE MICROTRANSACTIONS OR ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2029, REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON ITS FINDINGS AND ANY RECOMMENDATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.